Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5889.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-1.3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.3 entitled
"Expungement of Criminal Records" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.3-4. Effect of expungement of records — Access to expunged records —
Wrongful disclosure.
(a) Any person having his or her record expunged shall be released from all penalties and
disabilities resulting from the crime of which he or she had been convicted, except, upon conviction
of any subsequent crime, the expunged conviction may be considered as a prior conviction in
determining the sentence to be imposed.
(b) In any application for employment, license, or other civil right or privilege, or any
appearance as a witness, a person whose conviction of a crime has been expunged pursuant to this
chapter may state that he or she has never been convicted of the crime; provided, that if the person
is an applicant for a law enforcement agency position, for admission to the bar of any court, an
applicant for a teaching certificate, under chapter 11 of title 16, a coaching certificate under § 16-
11.1-1, or the operator or employee of an early childhood education facility pursuant to chapter
48.1 of title 16, or an applicant for a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver under §§ 11-47-
11 or 11-47-18, the person shall disclose the fact of a conviction.
(c) Whenever the records of any conviction and/or probation of an individual for the
commission of a crime have been expunged under the provisions of this chapter, any custodian of
the records of conviction relating to that crime shall not disclose the existence of the records upon

inquiry from any source unless the inquiry is that of the individual whose record was expunged,
that of a sentencing court following the conviction of the individual for the commission of a crime,
or that of a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary committee, board, or agency, or
court which is considering a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary matter, or that of
the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or that of any law enforcement agency
when the nature and character of the offense with which an individual is to be charged would be
affected by virtue of the person having been previously convicted of the same offense, or that of
any law enforcement agency which is considering the issuance of a license or permit to carry a
pistol or revolver under §§ 11-47-11 or 11-47-18.
(d) The custodian of any records which have been expunged pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter shall only release or allow access to those records for the purposes specified in
subsections (b) or (c) of this section or by order of a court. Any agency and/or person who willfully
refuses to carry out the expungement of the records of conviction pursuant to § 12-1.3-2, or this
section or willfully releases or willfully allows access to records of conviction, knowing them to
have been expunged, shall be civilly liable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002195
========
LC002195 - Page 2 of 3